Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1375.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; RIVER WATCH PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $170,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $170,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the clean water fund to the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency for grants to the Red River Watershed Management Board to enhance and expand the existing water quality and watershed monitoring river watch activities in schools in the Red River of the North watershed. By February 15, 2028, the Red River Watershed Management Board must provide a report to the commissioner and the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over environment and natural resources finance and policy and the clean water fund on the expenditure of this appropriation. new text end